California statutes. Public Utilities Code
-------------------------------------------

24402.

Any owner or operator who refuses or fails to comply with the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 24325) of Chapter 3 of this part or of Section 24360, and who without compliance with such provisions operates any aircraft in this state or knowingly permits any aircraft owned by such person to be operated by another in this state is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------

24403.

Every person permitting another person to operate an aircraft under the terms of any rental agreement which provides for any remuneration for the use of such aircraft who fails to comply with Section 24362 is guilty of a misdemeanor and is punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 90 days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

A failure by a person permitting another person to operate an aircraft under the terms of any rental agreement which provides for any remuneration for the use of such aircraft to obtain a receipt for the delivery of the certification or statement required by Section 24362 to the person renting the aircraft shall be prima facie evidence of a violation of Section 24362.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1164.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Declaration of Intent [24410. - 24410.]

24410.

It is the purpose of this part to establish minimum standards for aircraft financial responsibility, and nothing in this part shall be construed as preventing any local city or county ordinance from exceeding the minimum insurance requirements prescribed in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1452.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. AIRCRAFT DAMAGE REPORTING [24450. - 24451.]

24450.

Any person who causes damage to any aircraft that may reasonably be expected to affect the airworthiness of the aircraft shall do either of the following:

(a) Locate and notify the owner or person in charge of the aircraft of his or her name and address, and upon being requested to do so by the owner of the aircraft or person in charge of the aircraft, present his or her driver’s license or pilot’s license for identification purposes.

(b) Leave in a conspicuous place on the aircraft a written notice giving his or her name, address, and telephone number and a statement of the circumstances thereof, and, without unnecessary delay, notify the nearest safety representative of the Federal Aviation Administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 333, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

24451.

Any person failing to comply with the requirements of Section 24550 is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 333, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 10. TRANSIT DISTRICTS [24501. - 107025.]



PART 1. TRANSIT DISTRICTS IN COUNTIES OF ALAMEDA OR CONTRA COSTA [24501. - 27509.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [24501. - 24535.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [24501. - 24509.]

24501.

This part may be cited as the “Transit District Law.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 117.)
-------------------------------------------

24501.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, except Section 24826, elections for the Alameda-Contra Costa Transit District shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code). Any costs incurred by county officials shall be paid by the transit district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 191.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

24502.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the provisions of this article govern the construction of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

24503.

“District” means a transit district formed under this part; “board” means the board of directors of a district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 603.)
-------------------------------------------

24504.

“Voter” means any elector who is registered under the Elections Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24505.

“Transit” means the transportation of passengers and their incidental baggage by any means.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24506.

“Transit works” or “transit facilities” means all real and personal property, equipment, rights, or interests owned or to be acquired by the district for transit service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24507.

“Percent of the total vote cast,” when used with reference to the requirements of any petition or nomination paper, means percent of the total vote cast, exclusive of vote by mail ballots, within the proposed district, district, city or territory, as the case may be at the last statewide general election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 118, Sec. 5.   (AB 1412)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

24508.

“City” includes city and county and incorporated town, but does not include unincorporated town or village.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24509.

“Public agency” includes a city, city and county, a county, the State of California, or any public district organized under the laws of the State of California or any agency or authority of any thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. General Provisions [24531. - 24535.]

24531.

A transit district may be created as provided in this part and when so created may exercise the powers herein granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 603.)
-------------------------------------------

24532.

Except as otherwise provided in this part elections shall be held and conducted and the result ascertained, determined, and declared in all respects as nearly as practicable in conformity with the general election laws of the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 603.)
-------------------------------------------

24533.

Except as otherwise provided in this part all ordinances and notices which are required to be published shall be published within the district pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 603.)
-------------------------------------------

24534.

Whenever in this part publication is required and there is no newspaper of general circulation published within the district, the publication may be made in a newspaper of general circulation published in any county where the district is situated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 603.)
-------------------------------------------

24535.

Whenever the signature of any officer or employee of a district or of any member of the retirement board or of any officer or employee of the retirement system is authorized or required under this part, except in the single instance provided in Section 26244, the signature may be made by the use of a plate bearing facsimiles of those signatures or by submittal of a digital signature consistent with Section 16.5 of the Government Code or an electronic signature, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 1633.2 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 200, Sec. 1.   (AB 784)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Alameda-Contra Costa Transit District [24561. - 24561.]

24561.

The Alameda-Contra Costa Transit District formed pursuant to this section, as it read on January 1, 2021, shall continue in existence unless dissolved pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 27501) and is hereby designated a rapid transit district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 200, Sec. 3.   (AB 784)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Internal Organization of Districts [24801. - 24941.]



  ARTICLE 1. Government [24801. - 24801.]

24801.

The government of every district is vested in a board of seven directors, elected from wards, together with the other officers mentioned in this part. The directors shall be residents and voters of the respective wards from which they are nominated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 66, Sec. 1.   (AB 1141)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Election of Directors [24821. - 24832.]

24821.

The first directors are elected at the formation election as provided in Chapter 2. All elections of directors subsequent to the first shall be held at the same time as the general election in the manner provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24822.

Notice of election shall be published and no other notice of such election need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24823.

The board shall by resolution or ordinance fix the boundaries of the wards for the purpose of electing directors therefrom. The board shall adjust the boundaries of the wards for the purpose of electing directors therefrom pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 22000) of Division 21 of the Elections Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 435, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

24824.

The notice of election shall refer to the wards established by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24825.

Upon the filing of a sufficient nomination paper and affidavit by any candidate the name of the candidate shall go upon the ballot at the ensuing general election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24826.

(a) The nomination paper for a director shall contain the name of the candidate and other information as may be required by this article. The nomination paper shall also meet either of the following requirements:

(1) The nomination paper shall be signed by a minimum of 50 voters of the respective ward.

(2) The nomination paper shall include a filing fee in the amount of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) in lieu of signatures.

(b) All nomination papers shall be filed with, and all in-lieu fees shall be paid to, the county elections official in the county or counties in which the candidate is running.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 66, Sec. 2.   (AB 1141)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

24827.

Nomination papers may be circulated throughout each ward.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 66, Sec. 3.   (AB 1141)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

24828.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, the provisions of the Elections Code prescribed for independent nominations shall substantially govern the manner of appointment of verification deputies, the form of nomination papers and the securing of signatures, the filing of the candidate’s affidavit, and all other things necessary to get the name of the candidate upon the ballot. However, not more than 95 days prior to the election, upon request, the secretary of the district shall issue nomination papers and all other forms required for nomination to the
 office of director. Verification deputies may obtain signatures to the nomination paper of any candidate at any time not more than 95 days nor less than 74 days prior to the election, and all nomination papers shall be filed with the secretary of the district not more than 90 nor less than 74 days before the date of the election and shall be examined by him. Each candidate, at least 74 days prior to the election, shall file a sufficient candidate’s affidavit. The secretary of the district shall certify the names of all candidates to be placed upon the ballot to the county elections official or county elections officials within the territory affected at least 67 days prior to the date of election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 192.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

24829.

The board shall in the notice, ordinance, or resolution calling an election consolidate it with the general election to be held at the same time in the respective counties in which the district is located and authorize the respective boards of supervisors to canvass the returns and certify the result of the canvass to the board. It shall be the duty of the board or boards of supervisors to so consolidate the election, canvass the returns, and cause the result thereof to be properly certified to the board of directors of the district. The election shall be held in all respects as if there were only one election, and only one ticket or ballot shall be
 used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24830.

Candidates for the office of director shall be voted upon and elected one from each ward.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 66, Sec. 4.   (AB 1141)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

24831.

Upon receipt of the returns of the canvass by the respective boards of supervisors the board shall meet and determine results of the election and declare the candidate or candidates elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24832.

The secretary of the district shall issue certificates of election, signed by him and duly authenticated, immediately following the determination of the result of the election by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Terms of Office of Directors [24862. - 24866.]

24862.

At each biennial general election, a number of directors corresponding to the number whose terms of office expire shall be elected for the term of four years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 66, Sec. 6.   (AB 1141)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

24863.

(a) Effective with the November, 3, 2026, statewide general election, the terms of directors elected shall commence on December 5, 2026, and shall end at noon on January 6, 2031, upon their successors taking office, following the successors’ election in 2030.

(b) Effective with the November 7, 2028, statewide general election, the terms of directors elected shall commence on December 1, 2028, and shall end at noon on January 3, 2033, upon their successors taking office, following the successors’ election in 2032.

(c) On and after January 4, 2033, the terms of directors shall commence on the first Monday after the first day of January following their
 election.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 66, Sec. 8.   (AB 1141)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

24864.

Every director is subject to recall by voters of the district, in accordance with the recall provisions of the general laws of the State applicable to county officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24865.

Notwithstanding Section 1780 of the Government Code, the board shall fill all vacancies on the board, including those caused by the death or resignation of a member. If a vacancy exists for 90 days, the Governor shall fill the vacancy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 200, Sec. 6.   (AB 784)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

24866.

The person appointed to fill any vacancy on the board shall hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term of his predecessor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of Directors [24881. - 24890.]

24881.

The oath of office of directors shall be taken, subscribed, and filed with the secretary of the district at any time after the director has notice of his election or appointment but not later than 15 days after the commencement of his term of office. No other filing is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24882.

The board shall choose one of its members president, and another vice president, who shall be authorized to act for the president during his absence or disability, and shall provide for the time and place of holding its meetings, which shall be held at least once each month.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24883.

The board is the legislative body of the district and determines all questions of policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24884.

All matters and things necessary for the proper administration of the affairs of the district which are not provided for in this part shall be provided for by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 78.)
-------------------------------------------

24885.

The board shall supervise and regulate every transit facility owned and operated by the district, including the fixing of rates, rentals, charges, and classifications, and the making and enforcement of rules, regulations, contracts, practices, and schedules, for or in connection with any transit facility owned or controlled by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24886.

The board may adopt a personnel system for the purpose of recruiting and maintaining an effective working force with good morale. The board shall by resolution determine and create such number and character of positions as are necessary properly to carry on the functions of the district and shall establish an appropriate salary, salary range, or wage for each position so created. The board may by resolution abolish any such position. Except as otherwise provided, appointments to such positions shall be made by the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24887.

The board may from time to time contract for or employ any professional service required by the district or for the performance of work or services which cannot satisfactorily be performed by the regular employees of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24888.

The board shall have an annual audit made of all books and accounts of the district by a certified public accountant or public accountant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24889.

The board may provide by resolution, under such terms and conditions as it sees fit, for the payment of demands against the district without prior specific approval thereof by the board if the demand is for a purpose for which an expenditure has been previously approved by the board and in an amount no greater than the amount so authorized, and if the demand is approved by the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24890.

To facilitate the business of the district, the board may provide for the creation and administration of such funds as the needs of the district may require. The funds shall be disbursed in accordance with rules established by the board and all payments from any fund shall be reported to the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Meetings and Legislation [24906. - 24912.]

24906.

All legislative sessions of the board, whether regular or special, are open to the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24907.

A majority of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24908.

(a) The board may, by ordinance or resolution, provide that each director shall be paid a sum that shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each calendar month that they serve as a director. The board may, by ordinance or resolution, provide for an adjustment to the monthly compensation based upon the percentage increase in the California Consumer Price Index, as calculated by the Department of Finance, for
 the previous calendar year. The adjustment shall not become effective until
 the first day of the new fiscal year following the adoption of the ordinance or resolution.

(b) The ordinance or resolution to authorize a monthly stipend pursuant to subdivision (a), in lieu of per-meeting compensation, shall include a requirement that a director may receive a monthly stipend for a given month only if the director attends all scheduled and noticed regular board meetings for that month. For those directors meeting this attendance requirement, the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) shall be deducted from the stipend for failure to attend each meeting of a committee on which
 the director serves that month. In any month that a director fails to meet these attendance requirements, that director may be compensated at the rate of one hundred dollars ($100) per board or committee meeting attended, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for that month.

(c) For the purpose of this section, a director who misses a scheduled and noticed meeting of the board or committee while attending to official district business pursuant to authorization shall be deemed to have attended the meeting.

(d) The ordinance or resolution may provide for not more than two excused absences during a calendar year without disqualifying the director for a monthly stipend.

(e) In addition to the compensation otherwise provided in this section, each director may be allowed necessary
 traveling and personal expenses incurred solely as a result of the performance of their
 duties, in amounts as may be authorized by the board. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 66, Sec. 9.   (AB 1141)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

24909.

The acts of the board shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance. No ordinance shall be passed by the board on the day of its introduction, nor within three days thereafter, nor at any time other than a regular or adjourned regular meeting. No ordinance, resolution, or motion shall have any validity or effect unless passed by the affirmative votes of a majority of the directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24910.

All ordinances shall be published after passage.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24911.

The enacting clause of all ordinances shall be as follows:

“Be it enacted by the board of directors of________transit district:”

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24912.

All ordinances shall be signed by the president of the board or the vice president, and attested by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Other Officers [24926. - 24941.]

24926.

The board shall appoint and fix the salary of a general manager, who shall have full charge of the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of the facilities of the district and also of the administration of the business affairs of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24927.

All other things being equal, the board shall appoint as general manager some person who has had experience in the construction or management of transit facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24928.

The general manager need not be a resident of this State at the time of his appointment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24929.

The general manager shall hold office for an indefinite term and may be removed by the board only upon the adoption of a resolution by the affirmative vote of not less than a majority of the board. Before the general manager may be removed, he shall, if he demands it, be given a written statement of the reasons alleged for his removal and he shall have the right to be publicly heard thereon at a meeting of the board prior to the final vote on the resolution providing for his removal, but pending and during such hearing the board may suspend him from office. The board may not reduce the salary of the general manager below the amount fixed at the time of his original
 appointment except upon the adoption of a resolution by a like vote and after a like opportunity to be heard. The action of the board in suspending or removing the general manager or reducing his salary, if approved by a majority of the membership of the board, is final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24930.

Notwithstanding this article, until such time as the district has operated, controlled, or used facilities or parts of facilities for providing the inhabitants and cities within the boundaries of the district with transit services for a period of six months, the board may or may not appoint a general manager, who during such time holds office at the pleasure of the majority of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24931.

The board may appoint a secretary and a general counsel who shall hold office during the pleasure of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 200, Sec. 7.   (AB 784)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

24932.

The general counsel shall be admitted to practice law in the Supreme Court of the State, and shall have been actively engaged in the practice of law for not less than five years next preceding appointment pursuant to Section 24931.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 200, Sec. 8.   (AB 784)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

24932.5.

The secretary, and such assistants as the board may determine, shall have the power to administer all oaths or affirmations required by this part, including the oath of office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 744.)
-------------------------------------------

24934.

The oath of office of all appointive officers of the district shall be taken, subscribed, and filed with the secretary of the district at any time after the officer has notice of his appointment but not later than 15 days after the commencement of his term of office. No other filing is required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24935.

Each appointive officer shall devote their entire time to the district, meaning that the officer shall not engage in any other business or employment without prior approval from the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 200, Sec. 11.   (AB 784)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

24936.

Subject to the control of the board, the powers and duties of the general manager are:

(a) To have full charge of the acquisition, construction, maintenance, and operation of the facilities of the district.

(b) To have full charge of the administration of the business affairs of the district.

(c) To see that all ordinances of the district are enforced.

(d) To administer the personnel system adopted by the board and
 except for officers appointed by the board to appoint, discipline or remove all officers and employees subject to the rules and regulations adopted by the board and the labor provisions of this law, whichever are applicable.

(e) To attend all meetings of the board and submit a general report of the affairs of the district.

(f) To keep the board advised as to the needs of the district.

(g) To prepare or cause to be prepared all plans and specifications for the construction of the works of the district.

(h) To devote his entire time to the business of the district.

(i) To perform such other and additional duties as the board may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24937.

The general manager shall within 180 days from the end of each fiscal year cause to be published a financial report showing the result of operations for the preceding fiscal year and the financial status of the district on the last day thereof. The publication shall be made in the manner provided in this division for the publication of ordinances and notices generally.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 200, Sec. 12.   (AB 784)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

24938.

The general counsel shall take charge of all suits and other legal matters to which the district is a party or in which it is legally interested. The general counsel shall give their advice or opinion in writing whenever required by the board. The general counsel shall be the legal adviser of the general manager and other district officers and shall prepare or approve the forms of all ordinances, resolutions, contracts, bonds, and other legal documents connected with the business of the district. The general counsel shall perform other and additional services that the board may require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 200, Sec. 13.   (AB 784)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

24939.

The general manager shall cause to be installed and maintained a system of auditing and accounting which shall completely and at all times show the financial condition of the district. All warrants for the payment of demands against the district shall be paid in accordance with such rules as the board may establish.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24940.

The general manager shall provide for the custody of the funds of the district and the keeping of accounts of all receipts and disbursements. Payments shall be made only upon warrants duly and regularly signed by the president or vice president of the board, or other person authorized by the board so to do, and by the general manager or secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

24941.

With the consent of the board, the general manager may:

(a) Authorize the trust department of any state or national bank in this State, or a trust company authorized to act as such in this State, to receive as his agent deposits of any securities acquired by the district.

(b) Place and maintain for safekeeping as a trust deposit with the trust department of any state or national bank in this State, or a trust company authorized to act as such in this State, any securities owned by the district.

The
 bank or trust company selected shall have a total paid-in capital of at least one million dollars ($1,000,000). The general manager shall take from the trust department or trust company a receipt for the securities, and neither the general manager nor the district is responsible for the custody and safe return of the securities until they are withdrawn from the trust department or trust company by the general manager. Any trust department or trust company to which securities are delivered, either as agent or depositary for the general manager, shall make such disposition of the securities as the general manager directs and is responsible only for strict compliance with written instructions given to it by the general manager. All such securities are at all times subject to the order of the general manager.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Labor Provisions [25051. - 25057.]

25051.

(a) If a majority of the employees employed by a transit district in a unit appropriate for collective bargaining indicate a desire to be represented by a labor organization, the transit board, after determining pursuant to Section 25052 that the labor organization represents the employees in the appropriate unit, shall bargain with the accredited representative of those employees. Both parties shall
 bargain in good faith and make all reasonable efforts to reach agreement on the terms of a written contract governing wages, salaries, hours, working conditions, and grievance procedures.

(1) If a dispute arises over the terms of a written contract governing wages, salaries, hours, or working conditions that is not resolved by negotiations conducted in good faith between the transit board and the representatives of the employees, then upon the agreement of both parties, the transit board and the representatives of the employees may submit the dispute to an arbitration board. The decision of a majority of the arbitration board shall be final.

(2) (A) The arbitration board shall be composed of two representatives of the transit board, two representatives of the labor organization, and a fifth member to be agreed upon by the representatives of the transit board
 and labor organization.

(B) If the representatives of the transit board and labor organization are unable to agree on the fifth member, then the names of five persons experienced in labor arbitration shall be obtained from the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service. The labor organization and the transit district shall, alternately, strike a name from the list supplied by the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service. The labor organization and the transit district shall determine by lot who shall first strike a name from the list. After the labor organization and the transit district have stricken four names, the name remaining shall be designated as the arbitrator.

(C) The transit board and the labor organization shall each pay one-half of the cost of the impartial arbitrator.

(b) A contract
 or agreement shall not be made with any labor organization, association, group, or individual that denies membership on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code. However, the organization may preclude from membership any individual who advocates the overthrow of the government by force or violence.

(c) The district shall not discriminate with regard to employment against any person on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, except as otherwise provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 120.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

25052.

If there is a question whether a labor organization represents a majority of employees or whether the proposed unit is or is not appropriate, such matters shall be submitted to the State Conciliation Service for disposition. The State Conciliation Service shall promptly hold a public hearing and may, by decision, establish the boundaries of any collective bargaining unit and provide for an election to determine the question of representation. Provided, however, any certification of a labor organization to represent or act for the employees in any collective bargaining unit shall not be subject to challenge on the grounds that a new substantial question of representation
 within such collective bargaining unit exists until the lapse of one year from the date of certification or the expiration of any collective bargaining agreement, whichever is later.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25053.

Whenever any district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned public utility, either in proceedings by eminent domain or otherwise, to the extent necessary for operation of facilities, all of the employees of such public utility whose duties pertain to the facilities acquired who have been employed by said utility for at least seventy-five (75) days shall be appointed to comparable positions in the district without examination and shall be governed thereafter by the personnel system adopted by the board, and these employees shall be given sick leave, seniority and vacation credits in accordance with the records of the acquired public utility.

The provisions of this section shall apply only to those officers or supervisory employees of the acquired utility as shall be designated by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25054.

Whenever any district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned public utility, either in proceedings in eminent domain or otherwise, that has a pension plan in operation, members and beneficiaries of such pension plan shall continue to have the rights, privileges, benefits, obligations and status with respect to such established system; provided, however, that the outstanding obligations and liabilities of such public utility by reason of such pension plan have been considered and taken into account and allowance made for in the purchase price of such public utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25055.

The persons entitled to pension benefits as provided for in Section 25054 and the benefits which are provided shall be specified in the agreement or order by which any public utility is acquired by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

25056.

All persons receiving pension benefits from such acquired public utility and all persons entitled to pension benefits under any pension plan of such acquired public utility may become members or receive pensions under the retirement system established by the district as provided for in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 25301) of this part, or participated in by the district as provided for in Section 25305 of this part, by mutual agreement of such persons and the district. Such agreement may provide for the waiver of all rights, privileges, benefits and status, with respect to the pension plan of such acquired public utility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 744.)
-------------------------------------------

25057.

Notwithstanding any provisions of the Government Code, the board may authorize payment of any or all of the premiums on any group life, accident and health insurance, health and welfare plan, or pension or retirement plan, on officers or employees of a district. Upon authorization by its employees, a district may make deductions from the wages and salaries of its employees:
